apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="enk/e__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="enk/e_\Ø__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="enk/e_\s__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\s_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="juks/e__n" c="med dialektform juksa, juksafiske">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sid/e_\Ø__n">
  <!-- på sin side: -->
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
  <!-- nettside, blanke sider: -->
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e¹<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ad/el__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø\s_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ad/el_\Ø__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ad/el_\s__n">
  <e>       <p><l>lene</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ler</l>       <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="s_case"/><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="s_case\s\Ø_cp-both"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ære">             <i>ær</i><par n="enk/e_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="fødsel">          <i>føds</i><par n="ad/el_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="handel">          <i>hand</i><par n="ad/el_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="halve">           <i>halv</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="kirke">           <i>kirk</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="side">            <i>sid</i><par n="sid/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="vinkel">          <i>vink</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="ville">           <i>vill</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="bendel"><i>bend</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="brannsalve"><i>brannsalv</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="daudvinkel"><i>daudvink</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="girkasse"><i>girkass</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="høvel"><i>høv</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="karsporeplante"><i>karsporeplant</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="lendevirvel"><i>lendevirv</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="luftmaske"><i>luftmask</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="polarmåke"><i>polarmåk</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="rettsheimel"><i>rettsheim</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="sparkel"><i>spark</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="spillolje"><i>spillolj</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="trivsel"><i>trivs</i><par n="ad/el_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="vassmangel"><i>vassmang</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="vepsetalje"><i>vepsetalj</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="turteldue"><i>turteldu</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="anførsel"><i>anførs</i><par n="ad/el_\s__n"/></e>
<e lm="avstemningsregel"><i>avstemningsreg</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="bakerivare"><i>bakerivar</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="bilmesse"><i>bilmess</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="dulle"><i>dull</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="fjellregel"><i>fjellreg</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="fremleie"><i>fremlei</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="hjelpegruppe">    <i>hjelpegrupp</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="jukse">           <i>juks</i><par n="juks/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="jækel">           <i>jæk</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="kapusinerape">    <i>kapusinerap</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="kramvare">        <i>kramvar</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="lagkake">         <i>lagkak</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="midtbanerolle">   <i>midtbaneroll</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="motforholdsregel"><i>motforholdsreg</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="pjerrette">       <i>pjerrett</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="sadel">           <i>sad</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="seilflate">       <i>seilflat</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="snerpe">          <i>snerp</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="svartebørshandel"><i>svartebørshand</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="tege">            <i>teg</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="vandrehistorie">  <i>vandrehistori</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="egenveksel">            <i>egenveks</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="filliste">                 <i>fillist</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="forvaltningsregel">             <i>forvaltningsreg</i><par n="ad/el__n"/></e>
<e lm="klageregel">      <i>klagereg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="merkeregel">      <i>merkereg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="vektleggingsregel">      <i>vektleggingsreg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="forvaltningsregel">      <i>forvaltningsreg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="høringsregel">      <i>høringsreg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="beitebruksregel">      <i>beitebruksreg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="sanksjonsregel">      <i>sanksjonsreg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="rettighetsregel">      <i>rettighetsreg</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="sykepleiermangel">      <i>sykepleiermang</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="motivasjonspakke">        <i>motivasjonspakk</i><par n="enk/e_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="takhøgde">	<i>takhøgd</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="bygg-grynssuppe">                <i>bygg-grynssupp</i><par n="enk/e__n"/></e>
<e lm="kobbermangel">                         <i>kobbermang</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
<e lm="koppermangel">                         <i>koppermang</i><par n="ad/el_\Ø__n"/></e>
